West Virginia, session 2026, SB323.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Attorney General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on May 14, 1987, authorized under the authority of §46A-6-103 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (the prevention of unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the sale of damaged goods or damaged products, 142 CSR 06), is authorized with the amendments set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.10. to read as follows:	"1.10. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036."